Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-2301 to 76-2334 shall be known and may be cited as the One-Call Notification System Act.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 494;

Laws 2013, LB589, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB930, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 4.